test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-meer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - meer â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     meer+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: meer
     meer+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: meeru
     meer+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: meerast
     meer+N+Sg+Com+Indef: meerain
     meer+N+Ess+Indef: meeran
     meer+N+Par+Indef: meerad
     meer+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [meertaa, meertää]
     meer+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: meer
     meer+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: meerai
     meer+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: meeraid
     meer+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: meeraid
     meer+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: meerain
     meer+N+Pl+Com+Indef: meeraivuiʹm
     meer+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [meeraitaa, meeraitää]
